Iowa, session 2025-2026, SF401.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 2185XS (3) 91 as/js S.F. 401 Section 1. Section 704.6, Code 2025, is amended to read as 1 follows: 2 704.6 When defense defenses not available. 3 1. The defense of justification is not available to the 4 following: 5 1. a. One A person who is participating in a forcible 6 felony, or riot, or a duel. 7 2. b. One A person who initially provokes the use of force 8 against oneself the personâs self , with the intent to use such 9 force as an excuse to inflict injury on the assailant. 10 3. c. One A person who initially provokes the use of 11 force against oneself the personâs self by oneâs the personâs 12 unlawful acts , unless either of the following applies : 13 a. (1) Such force is grossly disproportionate to the 14 provocation, and is so great that the person reasonably 15 believes that the person is in imminent danger of death or 16 serious injury or . 17 b. (2) The person withdraws from physical contact with 18 the other and indicates clearly to the other that the person 19 desires to terminate the conflict but the other continues or 20 resumes the use of force. 21 2. The defenses of justification and diminished capacity 22 are not available to a person who is the subject of a 23 nonviolent sexual advance who commits a violent crime, as 24 defined in section 915.10, or to a person who commits an 25 assault, as defined in section 708.1, upon another person as 26 the result of the personâs discovery of, knowledge about, or 27 potential disclosure of the victimâs sex, sexual orientation, 28 or gender identity. 29